test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-i7nokaa7tsisi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - i'nokáá'tsisi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, boat AEW NA1
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Sg: i'nokáá'tsisi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Pl: i'nokáá'tsistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Non: i'nokáá'tsisi

     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: nitsi'nokáá'tsisi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: nitsi'nokáá'tsistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Non: nitsi'nokáá'tsisi
     
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: nitsi'nokáá'tsisinnaani
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: nitsi'nokáá'tsisinnaanistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Non: nitsi'nokáá'tsisinnaani

     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: kitsi'nokáá'tsisinnooni
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: kitsi'nokáá'tsisinnoonistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Non: kitsi'nokáá'tsisinnooni

     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kitsi'nokáá'tsisi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kitsi'nokáá'tsistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kitsi'nokáá'tsisi

     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: kitsi'nokáá'tsisoaawayi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: kitsi'nokáá'tsisoaawaistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Non: kitsi'nokáá'tsisoaawai

     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: otsi'nokáá'tsisi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: otsi'nokáá'tsistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Non: otsi'nokáá'tsisi

     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: otsi'nokáá'tsisoaawayi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: otsi'nokáá'tsisoaawaistsi
     i'nokáá'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Non: otsi'nokáá'tsisoaawai
